Hawaii, session 2026, GM1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII;
SECTION 1. Section 235-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, there shall
be allowed to each taxpayer subject to the taxes imposed by this
chapter, an income tax credit that shall be deductible from the
taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any, imposed by this
chapter for the taxable year in which the credit is properly
claimed. The amount of the credit shall be:
(1) Twenty-two per cent of the qualified production costs
incurred by a qualified production in any county of
the State with a population of over seven hundred
thousand; or
(2) Twenty-seven per cent of the qualified production
costs incurred by a qualified production in any county
2026-2423 SB2580 GDI SMA-3.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
of the State with a population of seven hundred
thousand or less[T-]2_
provided that a qualified production with a workforce'of at
least eighty per cent local hires shall be credited an
additional five per cent of the qualified production costs
incurred.
A qualified production occurring in more than one county may
prorate its expenditures based upon the amounts spent in each
county, if the population bases differ enough to change the
percentage of tax credit.
In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or
trust, the tax credit allowable is for qualified production
costs incurred by the entity for the taxable year. The cost
upon which the tax credit is computed shall be determined at the
IS entity level. Distribution and share of credit shall be
determined by rule.
If a deduction is taken under section 179 (with respect to
election to expense depreciable business assets) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, no tax credit shall be allowed
for those costs for which the deduction is taken.
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx
■inniiiMiiiHiiiiiiiiifflM

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
The basis for eligible property for depreciation of
accelerated cost recovery system purposes for state income taxes
shall be reduced by the amount of credit allowable and claimed."
2. By amending subsection (h) to read:
"(h) Every taxpayer claiming a tax credit under this
section for a qualified production shall, no later than ninety
days following the end of each taxable year in which qualified
production costs were expended, submit
(1) A written, sworn statement to the department of
business, economic development, and tourism that
identifies:
[-H-b] (A) All qualified production costs as provided by
subsection (a), if any, incurred in the previous
taxable year;
[-(-34-] (B) The amount of tax credits claimed pursuant to
this section, if any, in the previous taxable
year; and
[-(^4-] (C) The number of total hires versus the number of
local hires by category and by county [-;-] ; and
(2) An independent third-party certification issued by a
qualified certified public accountant, that verifies
2026-2423 SB2580 GDI SMA-3.docx 3

Page 4 2580
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
the information described in paragraph (1) and other
representations made for the purposes of claiming the
credit under this section, using procedures prescribed
by the department of business, economic development,
and tourism and the department of taxation.
This information may be reported from the department of
business, economic development, and tourism to the legislature
pursuant to subsection (i)(4)."
3. By amending subsection (1) to read:
"(1) Total tax credits claimed per qualified production
shall not exceed [$17,000,000.] $20,000,000; provided that this
limit shall not apply to any qualified production that incurs at
least $60,000,000 of qualified production costs."
4. By amending subsections (n) and (o) to read:
"(n) The total amount of tax credits allowed under this
section in any particular year shall be [^-^Ov-OO^-rO-O^T—howovor,
-irf] $60,000,000; provided that:
(1) If the total amount of credits applied for in any
particular year exceeds the aggregate amount of
credits allowed for that year under this section, the
excess shall be treated as having been applied for in
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx 4

Page 5
S.B. NO.
SK2
C.D. 1
the subsequent year and shall be claimed in the
subsequent year; ar^
(2) If the total amount of credits claimed in any
particular year is less than the aggregate amount of
credits allowed for that year under this section, the
unused amount, equal to the difference between the
aggregate cap for that year and the total credits
claimed in that year, shall be added to the aggregate
amount of credits allowed for the subsequent year;
provided further that no excess shall be allowed to be claimed
and no unused amounts shall be added to the aggregate amounts of
credit allowed for the subsequent year after December 31,
[2^52-r] 2037.
(o) For the purposes of this section;
"Commercial":
(1) Means an advertising message that is filmed using
film, videotape, or digital media, for dissemination
via television broadcast or theatrical distribution;
(2) Includes a series of advertising messages if all parts
are produced at the same time over the course of six
consecutive weeks; and
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx

Page 6
S.B. NO. ■
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(3) Does not include an advertising message with
Internet-only distribution.
"Digital media" means production methods and platforms
directly related to the creation of cinematic imagery and
content, specifically using digital means, including but not
limited to digital cameras, digital sound equipment, and
computers, to be delivered via film, videotape, interactive game
platform, or other digital distribution media.
"Post-production" means production activities and services
conducted after principal photography is completed, including
but not limited to editing, film and video transfers,
duplication, transcoding, dubbing, subtitling, credits, closed
captioning, audio production, special effects (visual and
sound), graphics, and animation.
"Production" means a series of activities that are directly
related to the creation of visual and cinematic imagery to be
delivered via film, videotape, or digital media and to be sold,
distributed, or displayed as entertainment or the advertisement
of products for mass public consumption, including but not
limited to scripting, casting, set design and construction.
2026-2423 SB2580 GDI SMA-3.docx 6
lEHilltllllllllUlllllllimV.

Page 7
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
transportation, videography, photography, sound recording,
interactive game design, and post-production.
"Qualified production":
(1) Means a production, with expenditures in the State,
for the total or partial production of a
feature-length motion picture, short film,
made-for-television movie, commercial, music video,
interactive game, broadcast television or streaming
platform series pilot, single season (up to twenty-two
episodes [4-] for a broadcast television series and up
to eight episodes for an ongoing series for streaming
platforms) of a [-feeievisieft] series [regularly] filmed
in the State [-H4] . If the number of episodes per
single season exceeds twenty-two[—] for a broadcast
television series or eight for a streaming platform
series, additional episodes for the same season shall
constitute a separate qualified production [-hr]
"Qualified production" includes a broadcast television
or st^^anmTg platform special, single [tolovision]
episode that is not part of a broadcast television or
streaming platform series regularly filmed or based in
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx
■liiBHUffliiiinnniNiHinii

Page 8 2580
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
the State, national magazine show, and national
talk. show. For the purposes of subsections (d) and
(1), each of the [aforementioned] qualified production
categories in this paragraph shall constitute
separate, individual qualified productions; and
(2) Does not include:
(A) News;
(B) Public affairs programs;
(C) Non-national magazine or talk shows;
(D) Televised sporting events or activities;
(E) Productions that solicit funds;
(F) Productions produced primarily for industrial,
corporate, institutional, or other private
purposes; and
(G) Productions that include any material or
performance prohibited by chapter 712.
"Qualified production costs" means the costs incurred by a
qualified production within the State that are subject to the
general excise tax under chapter 237 at the highest rate of tax
or income tax under this chapter if the costs are not subject to
general excise tax and that have not been financed by any
2026-2423 SB2580 GDI SMA-3.docx

Page 9 S.B. NO.
3^“^
. 'I H.D. 1
C.D, 1
investments for which a credit was or will be claimed pursuant
to section 235-110.9. [Qualified production cooto] "Qualified
production costs" include but are not limited to:
[1) Costs incurred during preproduction such as location
scouting and related services;
(2) Costs of set construction and operations, purchases or
rentals of wardrobe, props, accessories, food, office
supplies, transportation, equipment, and related
services;
(3) Wages or salaries of cast, crew, and musicians;
(4) Costs of photography, sound synchronization, lighting,
and related services;
(5) Costs of editing, visual effects, music, other
post-production, and related services;
(6) Rentals and fees for use of local facilities and
locations, including rentals and fees for use of state
and county facilities and locations that are not
subject to general excise tax under chapter 237 or
income tax under this chapter;
(7) Rentals of vehicles and lodging for cast and crew;
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx 9

Page 10 2580
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
I (8) Airfare for flights to or from Hawaii, and interisland
flights;
(9) Insurance and bonding;
(10) Shipping of equipment and supplies to or from Hawaii,
and interisland shipments; and
(11) Other direct production costs specified by the
department of taxation in consultation with the
department of business, economic development, and
tourism;
provided that any government-imposed fines, penalties, or
interest that are incurred by a qualified production within the
State shall not be "qualified production costs". "Qualified
production costs" does not include any costs funded by any
grant, forgivable loan, or other amounts not included in gross
income for purposes of this chapter.
"Streaming platform" means an online provider of
entertainment, including but not limited to movies and music,
that delivers content via an internet connection to the
subscriber's computer, television, or mobile device."
SECTION 2. Section 237-24.75, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx 10

Page 11 2580
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
"§237-24.75 Additional exemptions. In addition to the
amounts exempt under section 237-24, this chapter shall not
apply to:
(1) Amounts received as a beverage container deposit
collected under chapter 342G, part VIII;
(2) Amounts received by the operator of the Hawaii
convention center for reimbursement of costs or
advances made pursuant to a contract with the Hawaii
tourism authority under section 201B-7; [and-]
(3) Amounts received by a professional employer
organization that is registered with the department of
labor and industrial relations pursuant to chapter
373L, from a client company equal to amounts that are
disbursed by the professional employer organization
for employee wages, salaries, payroll taxes, insurance
premiums, and benefits, including retirement,
vacation, sick leave, health benefits, and similar
employment benefits with respect to covered employees
at a client company; provided that this exemption
shall not apply to amounts received by a professional
employer organization after:
2026-2423 SB2580 GDI SMA-3.docx ]
■iiiiHiiniimiiiinniiiiiiiii

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(A) Notification from the department of labor and
industrial relations that the professional
employer organization has not fulfilled or
maintained the registration requirements under
this chapter; or
(B) A determination by the department that the
professional employer organization has failed to
pay any tax withholding for covered employees or
any federal or state taxes for which the
professional employer organization is
responsible.
As used in this paragraph, "professional employer
organization", "client company", and "covered
employee" shall have the meanings provided in section
373L-1[—]; and
(4) Amounts received by a motion picture project employer
from a client company that represent reimbursements
for costs paid or incurred by the client company for
reasonable employment-related costs of motion picture
project workers or loan-out companies, including but
not limited to employee wages or salaries, payroll
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx 12
iiiinniniiiiiiiMiinM

Page 13 S.B. NO.
"“2
C.D. 1
t^2<es^imsurance£remijjmsj and^emp]^oyment^enerit^
such as retirement, vacation, sick leave, health
benefits, and comparable benefits; provided that this
exemption shall not apply to amounts paid for
services, administration, overhead, profit, markups,
or similar fees. For the purposes of this paragraph,
"motion picture project employer" and "motion picture
project worker" have the same meanings as those terms
are defined in section 3512 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended."
SECTION 3. Act 88, Session Laws of Hawaii 2006, as amended
by section 3 of Act 89, Session Laws of Hawaii 2013, as amended
by section 3 of Act 143, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, as amended
by section 4 of Act 217, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, is amended
by amending section 4 to read as follows:
"SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2006;
provided that:
(1) Section 2 of this Act shall apply to qualified
production costs incurred on or after July 1, 2006,
and before January 1, [2033;] 2038; and
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx 13

Page 14 2580
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) This Act shall be repealed on January 1, 2038,
and section 235-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be
reenacted in the form in which it read on the day
before the effective date of this Act."
SECTION 4. Act 143, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, is
amended by amending section 6 to read as follows:
"SECTION 6. [No later than January 1,—2018,—and each
J-anuary T thereafter,—each film production that hao produetion
c?{penditur-es of- $-!■,■ 000,-000 or more and io -e-laiming-a tax er-ed-it
te—seetaren—2^5——Hawaii Rcviocd Statutes,—shalrl
©fetaift—an—tftdependent—feharFd—parity—ee^?tifareatieft—ef—qttaiifared
pf^edaet-ian—eaat-s—eii-ga-feie—matieft—piefaneT—digital media,
and film-p-roduction inaame—tax credit in—the form ■of a tax
opinion,—as required under section 235-17(h),—Hawaii Rovioed
Statutes,—submitted to the department af—teuoinooo,—eaanamia
davaiapmenfe-j—and -tourism. ] Repealed. "
SECTION 5. If the total amount of motion picture, digital
media, and film production income tax credits claimed in any
particular year is less than the aggregate amount of credits
allowed for that year pursuant to section 235-17(n), Hawaii
Revised Statutes, the unused amount, equal to the difference
2026-2423 SB2580 CDl SMA-3.docx 14
aiimiJiiiiKunii'riiJiynimiin

Page 15
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
I between the aggregate cap for that year and the total credits
claimed in that year, shall be added to the aggregate amount of
credits allowed for the subsequent year.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that:
(1) Section 1 shall apply to costs incurred after
December 31, 2025; and
(2) Section 5 shall apply retroactively to costs incurred
after December 31, 2023.
2026-2423 SB2580 GDI SMA-3.docx 15
liiiiiiiiinimHHiH

S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 6th day of July . 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2580, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
202-26

SB No. 2580, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives